Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202054-7,109
Compliance with game
laws required.

Compliance with the Exotic Animal Auction or Exchange Venue Act does
not relieve a person of the requirement to comply with the provisions of sections
37-477 to 37-479.

Laws 2006, LB 856, § 10;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 54-753.06;

Laws 2014, LB884, § 18.